Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. REPEALER 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1755, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 2. REPEALER 47 O.S. 2021, Section 11-806.2, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10999 JBH 12/13/24





Req. No. 10999 Page 1